Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1979.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Mining and


Blasting Residential Protection Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9.2 of Title 45, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For the purposes of this section:





Req. No. 2994 Page 1


1. “Blasting operation” means the use of explosives associated


with mining pursuant to the provisions of Title 45 of the Oklahoma


Statutes and rules of the Department of Mines;


2. “Buffer zone” means the horizontal distance measured in a


straight line at the surface between a mining or blasting operation


and the boundary of a residence, residentially zoned property, or


protected structure;


3. “Mining operation” means mineral extraction and surface


mining;


4. “Protected structure” includes a:


a. church,


b. hospital,


c. licensed daycare facility,


d. public or private school,


e. nursing home or skilled nursing facility, and


f. residence not owned by the mining or blasting permit


holder;


5. “Residence” means a home occupied by the owner or a tenant


and not owned by a mining or blasting permit holder; and


6. “Residentially zoned property” means land zoned as AG-R, R-


3, any RES classification, or other similar classification for


residential use.





Req. No. 2994 Page 2


B. 1. A new mining permit or expansion shall not be authorized


for surface mining, excavation, or blasting within eight hundred


(800) feet of any residence or residentially zoned property.


2. A mining or blasting permit shall not be authorized for


mining or blasting operations within eight hundred (800) feet of any


protected structure.


3. The Department of Mines shall not issue a new permit or


approve an expansion unless the applicant demonstrates compliance


with paragraphs 1 and 2 of this subsection.


C. A mining operation permit shall include a:


1. Map identifying all residentially zoned properties and


protected structures within eight hundred (800) feet of the proposed


mining or blasting operation area; and


2. Clear depiction of the required eight-hundred-foot buffer


zone.


A blasting operation permit shall include the requirements in


paragraphs 1 and 2 of this subsection as well as a blasting plan


that demonstrates buffer zone compliance pursuant to rules


promulgated by the Department of Mines.


D. 1. In order to obtain a permit for a mining or blasting


operation, the applicant shall post signs and mail notices, pursuant


to paragraph 2 of this subsection, of the proposed mining or


blasting operation. The signs and letters shall be required for



Req. No. 2994 Page 3


initial zoning, rezoning, special exception, conditional use, or


similar requests and for final mining permits. The signs shall:


a. be posted along all public roads adjacent to the


proposed permit area,


b. be no less than four (4) square feet in size with


lettering at least two (2) inches tall, and


c. state the name of the applicant, the type of


application, and contact information for the


Department of Mines for the purposes of public comment


inquiries.


2. Notices shall be sent by mail to any address that lies


within the buffer zone of intent to make an application for


rezoning, special exception, or other application to the Department


of Mines forty-five (45) days in advance of such application


submission.


3. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to current


mining operations with valid permits unless the applicant is filing


an amendment or expansion request.


E. The Department of Mines shall promulgate rules to effectuate


the provisions of this section. If an applicant operates within the


buffer zone without a permit as required by this section, the


Department shall issue a cessation order until compliance is


restored. Permit suspension or revocation and civil penalties may


be imposed for violations of this section.

Req. No. 2994 Page 4


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2994 CN 1/15/2026 9:23:45 AM











































Req. No. 2994 Page 5